Hawaii statutes.
§377-15 Penalty. Any person who
wilfully assaults, resists, prevents, impedes, or interferes with the
conciliator or any member of the board or any of the agents or agencies of
either in the performance of duties pursuant to this chapter shall be fined not
more than $500 or imprisoned not more than one year, or both. [L 1945, c 250,
§15; RL 1955, §90-16; HRS §377-15; am L 1985, c 251, §24]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next